Alabama, session 2026rs, HB558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
HB558 INTRODUCED
Section 1. This act shall be known as the Reviewing
Urban-Rural Asymmetries in Legislation (RURAL) Act.
Section 2. The purpose of this act is to ensure that
proposed legislation is evaluated for its potential effects on
rural communities, agricultural stakeholders, and rural school
districts before enactment, promoting informed decision-making
and transparency in the legislative process. Additionally,
this act provides comparative analysis between rural,
suburban, and urban districts to highlight disparities and
ensure balanced policymaking.
Section 3. (a) Any member of the Legislature may submit
a formal request for a Rural Impact Report on any bill
introduced in a legislative session.
(b) Requests shall be submitted to the Legislative
Services Agency, which shall be responsible for conducting the
assessment.
Section 4. (a) A Rural Impact Report shall include all
of the following:
(1) An analysis of the bill's direct and indirect
effects on rural communities, including economic, social, and
regulatory impacts.
(2) A specific assessment of the potential consequences
for farmers and agricultural businesses.
(3) A localized breakdown of effects by legislative
district and affected rural communities.
(4) A comparative analysis of the bill's projected
impact on rural districts versus suburban and urban districts,
including any identified disparities or differential
Page 2

including any identified disparities or differential
HB558 INTRODUCED
consequences.
(5) An assessment of the bill's impact on rural school
districts, including, but not limited to, school funding and
budget allocations; student enrollment and demographic shifts;
access to educational resources, including technology and
extracurricular programs; teacher recruitment, retention, and
workforce stability; and potential for school closures or
consolidations due to legislative changes.
(6) Identification of potential benefits, costs, and
unintended consequences of the proposed legislation.
(b) Reports shall incorporate data from relevant
agencies, industry experts, education officials, and rural
stakeholders to ensure accuracy and comprehensiveness.
Section 5. (a) The Legislative Services Agency shall
endeavor to complete the Rural Impact Report within 30 days of
receiving a valid request.
(b) If additional time is needed due to data
limitations, the Legislative Services Agency shall notify the
requesting legislator in writing with an estimated completion
date.
Section 6. (a) Completed Rural Impact Reports shall be
made publicly available through the official website of the
Legislature.
(b) Copies shall also be provided to the requesting
legislator, relevant legislative committees, and rural
stakeholder organizations upon request.
Section 7. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3